Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.250

Bail bond recovery agent license—Requirements.

An applicant must meet the following requirements to obtain a bail bond recovery agent license:

(1) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper identification on a form prescribed by the director;

(2) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure his or her knowledge and competence in the bail recovery business;

(3) Be at least twenty-one years old;

(4) Be a citizen or legal resident alien of the United States;

(5) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent, and that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director shall make the director's determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;

(6) Not have had certification as a peace officer revoked or denied under chapter 43.101 RCW, unless certification has subsequently been reinstated under RCW 43.101.115;

(7) Submit a receipt showing payment for a background check through the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation;

(8) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties as a bail bond recovery agent;

(9)(a) Have a current license or equivalent permit to carry a concealed pistol;

(b) A resident alien must provide a copy of his or her alien firearm license; and

(10)(a) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond recovery agent license;

(b) A bail bond agent or qualified agent who wishes to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent must first obtain a bail bond recovery agent endorsement to his or her bail bond agent or agency license in order to act as a bail bond recovery agent, and pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond recovery agent endorsement.

[ 2008 c 105 s 5; 2004 c 186 s 3.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.